Hawaii statutes.
[§485A-410] Filing fees. (a) A person
shall pay a fee of $200 when initially filing an application for registration
as a broker-dealer and a fee of $200 when filing a renewal of registration as a
broker-dealer.

(b) The fee for an individual is $50 when
filing an application for registration as an agent, a fee of $50 when filing a
renewal of registration as an agent, and a fee of $50 when filing for a
transfer of registration as an agent.

(c) A person shall pay a fee of $100 when
filing an application for registration as an investment adviser and a fee of
$100 when filing a renewal of registration as an investment adviser.

(d) The fee for an individual is $50 when
filing an application for registration as an investment adviser representative,
a fee of $50 when filing a renewal of registration as an investment adviser
representative, and a fee of $50 when filing for a transfer of registration as
an investment adviser representative.

(e) A federal covered investment adviser
required to file a notice under section 485A-405 shall pay an annual fee of
$100.

(f) A person required to pay a fee under this
section may transmit the fee through or to a designee of the commissioner as
provided in a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter.

(g) The fee for copies of documents filed in
the office of the commissioner shall be 25 cents per page. [L 2006, c 229, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next